Alabama, session 2026rs, SB259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
12 Section 1. Sections 11-2A-1 and 11-2A-2, and Section
13 11-2A-4, as last amended by Act 2025-324, 2025 Regular
14 Session, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
15 "§11-2A-1
16 (a) For purposes of determining the amount of annual
17 compensation which that a county shall pay to a county
18 commissioner, the chair of a county commission, a judge of
19 probate, a sheriff, a tax assessor, a tax collector, a revenue
20 commissioner, a license commissioner, and or an elected
21 assistant tax assessor or collector, the 67 counties of the
22 state shall be placed in categories based on population
23 according to the most recent 1990 federal decennial census.
24 (b) The population categories of counties are as
25 follows:
26 (1) CATEGORY 1. Population in excess of 450,000.
27 (2) CATEGORY 2. Population from 350,001 to 449,999.
28 (3) CATEGORY 3. Population from 200,001 to 350,000.
Page 1

(3) CATEGORY 3. Population from 200,001 to 350,000.
SB259 Enrolled
29 (4) CATEGORY 4. Population from 50,001 to 200,000.
30 (5) CATEGORY 5. Population from 19,000 to 50,000.
31 (6) CATEGORY 6. Population of less than 19,000."
32 "§11-2A-2
33 (a) Effective October 1, 2000, the The annual
34 compensation which a county shall pay to a county
35 commissioner, the chair of a county commission, a judge of
36 probate, a sheriff, a tax assessor, a tax collector, a revenue
37 commissioner, a license commissioner, and an elected assistant
38 tax assessor or collector shall be as set out below:the annual
39 base compensation paid to the holder of the office on May 31,
40 2026.
41 (1) SHERIFF. The annual minimum compensation for each
42 sheriff shall be fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) which shall
43 be in lieu of any salary and expense allowance currently
44 provided to a sheriff receiving total compensation less than
45 the minimum. Beginning with the next term of office for each
46 sheriff, except as provided in Section 11-2A-4, the salary
47 herein provided shall be the minimum compensation payable to
48 the sheriff in lieu of any salary, expense allowance, or other
49 compensation provided by law.
50 (2) COUNTY COMMISSIONERS AND JUDGES OF PROBATE. The
51 annual minimum compensation for county commissioners and
52 judges of probate in Categories 1 and 2 shall be as provided
53 by local law. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter and
54 subject to the provisions of Section 11-2A-4, the annual
55 compensation for county commissioners and judges of probate in
56 Category 3 shall be increased by 20 percent effective October
Page 2

Category 3 shall be increased by 20 percent effective October
SB259 Enrolled
57 1, 2001, if the compensation, including expense allowance, of
58 the office has not been increased by other general or local
59 law during the period from October 1, 1996, to October 1,
60 2001; the annual minimum compensation for county commissioners
61 and judges of probate in Category 4 shall be that amount
62 prescribed by general law on September 30, 2000, plus a 20
63 percent increase; the annual minimum compensation for county
64 commissioners and judges of probate in Category 5 shall be
65 that amount prescribed by general law on September 30, 2000,
66 plus a 17 percent increase; and the annual minimum
67 compensation for county commissioners and judges of probate in
68 Category 6 shall be that amount prescribed by general law on
69 September 30, 2000, plus a 15 percent increase.
70 (3) TAX ASSESSORS, TAX COLLECTORS, REVENUE
71 COMMISSIONERS, LICENSE COMMISSIONERS, AND ELECTED ASSISTANT
72 TAX COLLECTORS OR ASSESSORS.
73 a. On and after June 1, 2000, each county commission is
74 authorized to provide an expense allowance to the tax
75 assessor, tax collector, revenue commissioner, license
76 commissioner, elected assistant tax assessor, and elected
77 assistant tax collector in amounts not to exceed ten thousand
78 dollars ($10,000) per annum. The expense allowance may be
79 phased in over a two-year period as determined by the county
80 commission. At the beginning of the official's next term of
81 office following the provision of the expense allowance
82 authorized herein, the expense allowance shall be included in
83 the base salary of the official and the expense allowance
84 thereupon voided. Deductions from the expense allowances
Page 3

thereupon voided. Deductions from the expense allowances
SB259 Enrolled
85 provided under this chapter shall be made for supernumerary
86 programs, the State Employees' Retirement System, or other
87 retirement programs as provided by law, the same as if the
88 expense allowances were salary. Notwithstanding the above, in
89 Category 3, an expense allowance for any official covered by
90 this subdivision shall be provided in the amount of ten
91 thousand dollars ($10,000) per annum effective October 1,
92 2001, if compensation for the office has not been increased by
93 other general or local law during the period from October 1,
94 1996, to October 1, 2001.
95 b. Any increase in base salary or expense allowance for
96 a tax assessor, tax collector, revenue commissioner, license
97 commissioner, elected assistant tax assessor, or elected
98 assistant tax collector contained in any act passed in the
99 1999 2nd Special Session of the Legislature or any other act
100 passed in the 2000 Regular Session shall be credited against
101 any expense allowance provided under this subdivision, so that
102 the total increase in compensation for a tax assessor, tax
103 collector, revenue commissioner, license commissioner, elected
104 assistant tax assessor, and elected assistant tax collector
105 does not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).
106 (4) (b) Any laws to the contrary notwithstanding,
107 Unless otherwise provided by law, no person individual holding
108 supernumerary office shall be entitled to any increases in
109 compensation or expenses as a result of the implementation of
110 any salary adjustments provided for in this chapter.
111 (5) (c)(1) If implementation of the salaries in this
112 chapter increases the salary of an incumbent office holder,
Page 4

chapter increases the salary of an incumbent office holder,
SB259 Enrolled
113 the increase shall be paid as an expense allowance until the
114 beginning of the next term of office whereupon the amount of
115 the expense allowance shall be included in the base salary for
116 the office holder and the expense allowance shall be voided.
117 Deductions from the increase shall be made for supernumerary
118 programs as provided by law as if the increase were salary.
119 (2) Notwithstanding the foregoingsubdivision (1), a
120 county shall pay the salary increase during a term of office
121 at the beginning of the next fiscal year if payment of the
122 increase is sanctioned by an amendment to the Constitution of
123 Alabama of 1901.
124 (6)(d) Notwithstanding this section or any other
125 provision of this chapter, the increases in fees under Section
126 12-19-90 provided for by Act 2000-108 shall not apply to any
127 county in Category 1 or 3 on June 1, 2000.
128 (7) The local governing body of the county may, by
129 resolution, elect for the county to be exempt from the
130 provisions of this section and Section 11-2A-3 and the
131 increases in fees in Section 12-19-90 as provided for by Act
132 2000-108; provided that the local governing body shall only be
133 authorized to exempt the county from all of the sections
134 referenced above, and provided further that the resolution is
135 adopted after June 1, 2000, but prior to October 1, 2000. Any
136 local governing body that exercises its authority under this
137 subdivision may elect to have the county become subject to the
138 provisions referenced above by the adoption of a resolution
139 and the provisions shall become effective in the county on
140 September 30, next following the adoption of the resolution.
Page 5

September 30, next following the adoption of the resolution.
SB259 Enrolled
141 (8) Any county identified as a "Category 1" county
142 under the provisions of Section 11-2A-1, is exempt from the
143 provisions of this section."
144 "§11-2A-4
145 (a)(1) After August 1, 2016, the The local officials
146 covered by this chapter shall be entitled to receive the same
147 uniform increases in compensation, whether the uniform
148 increases are based on a percentage of compensation or a flat
149 dollar amount, which are granted equally to all full-time
150 county employees by the county commission. The increases shall
151 be in the same amount or percentage, as the case may be, as
152 that amount or percentage increase provided to the county's
153 employees and shall apply to the official's base salary and to
154 any expense allowance the official receives pursuant to this
155 subdivision.
156 (2) Except as otherwise provided herein, officials in
157 Category 2 shall be eligible for the cost-of-living increases
158 beginning on October 1, 2000. If the implementation of this
159 chapter increases the compensation of an incumbent office
160 holder, the increase shall be paid as provided in Section
161 11-2A-2.
162 (3) The base compensation of any local official
163 initially elected or appointed after July 1, 2025, shall be
164 the compensation of the immediately prior officeholder
165 including any uniform increases received by the prior
166 officeholder, but excluding any compensation based on the
167 previous office holder's longevity or that was awarded based
168 on merit, including, but not limited to, a local merit system.
Page 6

on merit, including, but not limited to, a local merit system.
SB259 Enrolled
169 Any official shall continue to be entitled to receive uniform
170 increases in compensation as provided in subdivision (1).
171 (4) If a county commission grants a uniform increase to
172 all county employees other than those employees serving their
173 probationary period, the increase shall qualify as a uniform
174 increase to all county employees for the purposes of this
175 subsection.
176 (5) A merit-based increase shall not qualify as a
177 uniform increase unless all county employees receive the same
178 percentage or dollar increase.
179 (6) In a county with a classification system for
180 employees that includes annual step raises for each
181 classification of employee, the step raises shall be
182 considered a uniform increase for the purposes of this section
183 if the steps are based on a uniform dollar amount or
184 percentage, and the service credits for elected officials are
185 calculated and administered in the same manner as other
186 employees.
187 (b) Any provision of this chapter to the contrary
188 notwithstanding, the Legislature, by local law, may increase
189 the compensation for local officials covered under this
190 chapter. However, if a local law increases the compensation of
191 a local official, the local official shall be entitled to any
192 uniform increases pursuant to the procedure in subsection (a),
193 except as otherwise provided by local law.
194 (c)(1) Any local official whose compensation is tied to
195 compensation of a state official shall not be entitled to
196 receive any uniform increases in compensation under this
Page 7

receive any uniform increases in compensation under this
SB259 Enrolled
197 chapter.
198 (2) The provision of any local law enacted prior to the
199 2026 Regular Session which is in contradiction to subdivision
200 (1) shall be invalid once the individual serving in that
201 office on May 31, 2026, vacates that office.
202 (3) Following the 2025 Regular Session, no local law
203 may authorize a local official to receive uniform increases in
204 contradiction to subdivision (1).
205 (4) Beginning with the next term of office following
206 October 1, 2025, the compensation of any local official
207 subject to a local law that sets his or her compensation in
208 whole or in part on the salary of a circuit or district judge
209 shall be calculated using the base amounts in Section
210 12-10B-1, and any adjustment based on service or longevity
211 must be based on the actual time in office of the local
212 official."
213 Section 2. Sections 11-2A-3, 11-2A-6, 11-2A-7, and
214 11-2A-8, Code of Alabama 1975, relating to the compensation of
215 county officials, are repealed.
216 Section 3. This act shall become effective on June 1,
217 2026.
Page 8

2026.
SB259 Enrolled
218
219
220
221
222
223
224 ________________________________________________
225 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
226
227
228
229 ________________________________________________
230 Speaker of the House of Representatives
231
232
233 SB259
234 Senate 12-Feb-26
235 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
236 the Senate, as amended.
237
238 Patrick Harris,
239 Secretary.
240
241
242
243
244 House of Representatives
245 Amended and passed: 26-Feb-26
246
247
248
249
250 Senate concurred in House amendment 3-Feb-26
251
252
253
254
255 By: Senator Singleton
Page 9